Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-704
Sanctuaries; rules and regulations; Missouri River sanctuaries; power of commission.

The commission may adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations for the protection of game or wild fowl sanctuaries as it may find necessary to protect game, wild fowl, or song birds thereon or to make effective rules and regulations in conjunction with other states over the Missouri River for the protection of wild fowl thereon and fish therein. Such rules and regulations shall be adopted and promulgated pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1929, c. 112, IV, § 4, p. 421;

C.S.1929, § 37-404;

R.S.1943, § 37-404;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-404;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 318.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.